Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202424-345
Funds uncalled for; payment to State Treasurer; clerk's liability discharged.

All money, other than witness fees, fines, penalties, forfeitures and license money, that comes into the possession of the clerk of the district court for any county in the State of Nebraska by virtue of his or her office and remains in the custody of the clerk of the district court, uncalled for by the party or parties entitled to the money for a period of three years following the close of litigation in relation to the money, shall be remitted by the clerk of the district court to the State Treasurer on the first Tuesday in January, April, July, or October, respectively, following the expiration of the three-year period, for deposit in the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund pursuant to section 69-1317. Such payment shall release the bond of the clerk of the district court making such payment from all liability for the money so paid in compliance with this section.

Laws 1933, c. 33, § 1, p. 214;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 27-342;

R.S.1943, § 24-345;

Laws 1980, LB 572, § 1;

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 26, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB406, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB532, § 1.